Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6773YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 2210 Section 1. Section 455B.261, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 2. Section 455B.265, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. In its consideration of applications for permits, the 5 department shall give priority in processing to persons in 6 the order that the applications are received, except where 7 when the application of this processing priority system 8 prevents the prompt approval of routine applications or 9 where when the public health, safety, or welfare will be 10 threatened by delay. If the department determines after 11 investigation that the diversion, storage, or withdrawal is 12 consistent with the principles and policies of beneficial 13 use and ensuring conservation, the department shall grant a 14 permit. The determination of beneficial use shall be made on 15 a case-by-case basis, and shall not be based on categories 16 of uses. An application for a permit shall be approved or 17 denied within ninety days from the date that the department 18 receives the complete application. A renewal permit shall be 19 approved or denied by the department within thirty days from 20 the date that the department receives a complete application 21 for renewal. If the applicant requests an extension of the 22 time allotted, the department may approve the request to allow 23 the applicant more time to submit additional information to 24 resolve a contested or complex application. Regardless of the 25 request in the application, and subject to appeal, the director 26 or the department may determine the duration and frequency 27 of withdrawal and the quantity of water to be diverted, 28 stored, or withdrawn pursuant to the permit. Each permit 29 granted after July 1, 1986, shall include conditions requiring 30 routine conservation practices, and requiring implementation 31 of emergency conservation measures after notification by the 32 department. 33